src/morphology/roots/51.lexc
[WORD_ID=iso'|'veli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:isolta{#}veljeltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'veli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:isolla{#}veljellä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'veli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:isolle{#}veljelle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'veli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:isosta{#}veljestä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'veli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:isona{#}veljenä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'veli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:ison{#}veljen Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'veli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:isossa{#}veljessä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'veli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:iso{#}veli Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'veli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:isoa{#}veljeä Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'veli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:isoksi{#}veljekse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'veli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:isoksi{#}veljeksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:isoitta{#}vihoitta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:isoilta{#}vihoilta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:isoilla{#}vihoilla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:isoille{#}vihoille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:isoista{#}vihoista Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:isoina{#}vihoina Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:isojen{#}vihojen Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:isoissa{#}vihoissa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:isot{#}vihot Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:isoja{#}vihoja Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:isoiksi{#}vihoikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:isoiksi{#}vihoiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:isotta{#}vihatta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:isolta{#}vihalta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:isolla{#}vihalla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:isolle{#}vihalle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:isosta{#}vihasta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:isona{#}vihana Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:ison{#}vihan Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:isossa{#}vihassa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:iso{#}viha Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:isoa{#}vihaa Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:isoksi{#}vihakse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=iso'|'viha][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:isoksi{#}vihaksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:karkeitta{#}rehuitta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:karkeilta{#}rehuilta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:karkeilla{#}rehuilla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:karkeille{#}rehuille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:karkeista{#}rehuista Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:karkeina{#}rehuina Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:karkeiden{#}rehujen Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:karkeissa{#}rehuissa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:karkeat{#}rehut Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:karkeita{#}rehuja Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:karkeiksi{#}rehuikse Possessive/Obligatory+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:karkeiksi{#}rehuiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:karkeatta{#}rehutta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:karkealta{#}rehulta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:karkealla{#}rehulla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:karkealle{#}rehulle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:karkeasta{#}rehusta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:karkeana{#}rehuna Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:karkean{#}rehun Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:karkeassa{#}rehussa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:karkea{#}rehu Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:karkeaa{#}rehua Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:karkeaksi{#}rehukse Possessive/Obligatory+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=karkea'|'rehu][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:karkeaksi{#}rehuksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:kevyittä{#}sarjoitta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:kevyiltä{#}sarjoilta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:kevyillä{#}sarjoilla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:kevyille{#}sarjoille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:kevyistä{#}sarjoista Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:kevyinä{#}sarjoina Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:kevyiden{#}sarjojen Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:kevyissä{#}sarjoissa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:kevyet{#}sarjat Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:kevyitä{#}sarjoja Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:kevyiksi{#}sarjoikse Possessive/Obligatory+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:kevyiksi{#}sarjoiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:kevyettä{#}sarjatta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:kevyeltä{#}sarjalta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:kevyellä{#}sarjalla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:kevyelle{#}sarjalle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:kevyestä{#}sarjasta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:kevyenä{#}sarjana Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:kevyen{#}sarjan Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:kevyessä{#}sarjassa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:kevyt{#}sarja Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:kevyttä{#}sarjaa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:kevyeksi{#}sarjakse Possessive/Obligatory+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kevyt'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:kevyeksi{#}sarjaksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:kirjavitta{#}pillikkeittä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:kirjavilta{#}pillikkeiltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:kirjavilla{#}pillikkeillä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:kirjaville{#}pillikkeille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:kirjavista{#}pillikkeistä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:kirjavina{#}pillikkeinä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:kirjavien{#}pillikkeiden Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:kirjavissa{#}pillikkeissä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:kirjavat{#}pillikkeet Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:kirjavia{#}pillikkeitä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:kirjaviksi{#}pillikkeikse Possessive/Obligatory+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:kirjaviksi{#}pillikkeiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:kirjavatta{#}pillikkeettä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:kirjavalta{#}pillikkeeltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:kirjavalla{#}pillikkeellä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:kirjavalle{#}pillikkeelle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:kirjavasta{#}pillikkeestä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:kirjavana{#}pillikkeena Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:kirjavan{#}pillikkeen Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:kirjavassa{#}pillikkeessä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:kirjava{#}pillike Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:kirjava{#}pillike Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:kirjavaa{#}pillikettä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:kirjavaksi{#}pillikkeekse Possessive/Obligatory+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kirjava'|'pillike][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:kirjavaksi{#}pillikkeeksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=kuiva'|'kakku][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:kuivitta{#}kakuitta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kuiva'|'kakku][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:kuivilta{#}kakuilta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kuiva'|'kakku][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:kuivilla{#}kakuilla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kuiva'|'kakku][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:kuiville{#}kakuille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kuiva'|'kakku][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:kuivista{#}kakuista Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kuiva'|'kakku][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:kuivina{#}kakkuina Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kuiva'|'kakku][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:kuivien{#}kakkujen Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=kuiva'|'kakku][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:kuivissa{#}kakuissa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kuiva'|'kakku][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:kuivat{#}kakut Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=kuiva'|'kakku][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:kuivia{#}kakkuja Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kuiva'|'kakku][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:kuiviksi{#}kakuikse Possessive/Obligatory+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kuiva'|'kakku][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:kuiviksi{#}kakuiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=kuiva'|'kakku][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:kuivatta{#}kakutta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kuiva'|'kakku][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:kuivalta{#}kakulta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kuiva'|'kakku][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:kuivalla{#}kakulla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kuiva'|'kakku][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:kuivalle{#}kakulle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kuiva'|'kakku][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:kuivasta{#}kakusta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=kuiva'|'kakku][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:kuivana{#}kakuna Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
